Illinois, session 104th, SB2711.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of 5Marriage Act is amended by adding Section 506.1 as follows: 6    (750 ILCS 5/506.1 new)7    Sec. 506.1. Study of guardian ad litem costs and effects 8in family law proceedings.9    (a) The Administrative Office of the Illinois Courts, in 10consultation with the Department of Human Services and the 11Department of Children and Family Services, shall conduct a 12comprehensive study on the use, cost, and accessibility of 13guardian ad litem services in family law proceedings.14    (b) The purpose of the study shall be to evaluate the 15impact of guardian ad litem appointments on litigants, with 16particular focus on low-income families, and to identify 17whether current practices promote fairness, access to justice, 18and the best interests of children.19    (c) The study shall include, but not be limited to, the 20following:21        (1) A review of the average costs of guardian ad litem 22    services across Illinois counties and an assessment of the 23    financial burden placed on low-income litigants.  SB2711- 2 -LRB104 15672 JRC 28844 b1        (2) An examination of whether the cost of guardian ad 2    litem services creates barriers to participation in family 3    law proceedings or results in inequitable treatment of 4    parties with differing financial means.5        (3) An evaluation of the role and benefits of guardian 6    ad litem appointments in ensuring that the voice and best 7    interests of the child are effectively represented.8        (4) Identification of potential shortcomings, 9    including concerns of affordability, lack of transparency 10    in billing practices, and whether guardian ad litem 11    recommendations disproportionately affect litigants based 12    on income status.13        (5) An analysis of the structure, funding, and 14    regulation of other states' guardian ad litem programs, 15    with particular attention to cost allocation models that 16    reduce burdens on low-income parties.17        (6) An assessment of whether establishing a State 18    subsidized guardian ad litem fund in Illinois would assist 19    in improving family law cases involving low-income 20    litigants, improve access to justice, and promote more 21    equitable outcomes.22        (7) Recommendations regarding potential statutory or 23    administrative reforms to balance the benefits of guardian 24    ad litem representation with equitable cost structures 25    that ensure no child is disadvantaged because of a 26    parent's financial circumstances.  SB2711- 3 -LRB104 15672 JRC 28844 b1    (d) The study shall incorporate input from litigants with 2experience in the matters covered in the study, judges, family 3law practitioners, guardians ad litem, parent advocacy groups, 4and child welfare experts.5    (e) The Administrative Office of the Illinois Courts shall 6submit a final report to the General Assembly and the Governor 7no later than December 31, 2026. The report shall include 8findings, analyses, and recommendations, including potential 9statutory language, to update Illinois law governing guardian 10ad litem appointments, costs, and funding structures in family 11law proceedings.12    (f) This Section is repealed on January 1, 2028.